Illinois, session 104th, SB3224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Personnel Code is amended by changing 5Section 4d as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 415/4d)  (from Ch. 127, par. 63b104d)7    Sec. 4d. Partial exemptions. The following positions in 8State service are exempt from jurisdictions A, B, and C to the 9extent stated for each, unless those jurisdictions are 10extended as provided in this Act:11        (1) In each department, board or commission that now 12    maintains or may hereafter maintain a major administrative 13    division, service or office in both Sangamon County and 14    Cook County, 2 private secretaries for the director or 15    chairman thereof, one located in the Cook County office 16    and the other located in the Sangamon County office, shall 17    be exempt from jurisdiction B; in all other departments, 18    boards and commissions one private secretary for the 19    director or chairman thereof shall be exempt from 20    jurisdiction B. In all departments, boards and commissions 21    one confidential assistant for the director or chairman 22    thereof shall be exempt from jurisdiction B. This 23    paragraph is subject to such modifications or waiver of   SB3224 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    the exemptions as may be necessary to assure the 2    continuity of federal contributions in those agencies 3    supported in whole or in part by federal funds.4        (2) The resident administrative head of each State 5    charitable, penal and correctional institution, the 6    chaplains thereof, and all member, patient and inmate 7    employees are exempt from jurisdiction B.8        (3) The Civil Service Commission, upon written 9    recommendation of the Director of Central Management 10    Services, shall exempt from jurisdiction B other positions 11    which, in the judgment of the Commission, involve either 12    principal administrative responsibility for the 13    determination of policy or principal administrative 14    responsibility for the way in which policies are carried 15    out, except positions in agencies which receive federal 16    funds if such exemption is inconsistent with federal 17    requirements, and except positions in agencies supported 18    in whole by federal funds.19        (4) All individuals in positions paid in accordance 20    with prevailing wage laws, as well as beauticians and 21    teachers of beauty culture and teachers of barbering.22        (5) Licensed attorneys in positions as legal or 23    technical advisors; positions in the Department of Natural 24    Resources requiring incumbents to be either a registered 25    professional engineer or to hold a bachelor's degree in 26    engineering from a recognized college or university;   SB3224 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    licensed physicians in positions of medical administrator 2    or physician or physician specialist (including 3    psychiatrists); all positions within the Department of 4    Juvenile Justice requiring licensure by the State Board of 5    Education under Article 21B of the School Code; all 6    positions within the Illinois School for the Deaf and the 7    Illinois School for the Blind Visually Impaired requiring 8    licensure by the State Board of Education under Article 9    21B of the School Code and all rehabilitation/mobility 10    instructors and rehabilitation/mobility instructor 11    trainees at the Illinois School for the Blind Visually 12    Impaired; and registered nurses (except those registered 13    nurses employed by the Department of Public Health); 14    except those in positions in agencies which receive 15    federal funds if such exemption is inconsistent with 16    federal requirements and except those in positions in 17    agencies supported in whole by federal funds, are exempt 18    from jurisdiction B only to the extent that the 19    requirements of Section 8b.1, 8b.3 and 8b.5 of this Code 20    need not be met.21        (6) All positions established outside the geographical 22    limits of the State of Illinois to which appointments of 23    other than Illinois citizens may be made are exempt from 24    jurisdiction B.25        (7) Staff attorneys reporting directly to individual 26    Commissioners of the Illinois Workers' Compensation   SB3224 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    Commission are exempt from jurisdiction B.2        (8) (Blank).3(Source: P.A. 103-108, eff. 6-27-23.) 4    Section 10. The Rehabilitation of Persons with 5Disabilities Act is amended by changing Sections 10, 10a, 13, 6and 17 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2405/10)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3441)8    Sec. 10. Residential schools; visual and hearing 9disabilities. 10    (a) The Department of Human Services shall operate 11residential schools for the education of children with visual 12and hearing disabilities who are unable to take advantage of 13the regular educational facilities provided in the community, 14and shall provide in connection therewith such academic, 15vocational, and related services as may be required. Children 16shall be eligible for admission to these schools only after 17proper diagnosis and evaluation, in accordance with procedures 18prescribed by the Department.19    (a-5) The Superintendent of the Illinois School for the 20Deaf shall be the chief executive officer of, and shall be 21responsible for the day to day operations of, the School, and 22shall obtain educational and professional employees who are 23certified by the Illinois State Board of Education or licensed 24by the appropriate agency or entity to which licensing   SB3224 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1authority has been delegated, as well as all other employees 2of the School, subject to the provisions of the Personnel Code 3and any applicable collective bargaining agreement. The 4Superintendent shall be appointed by the Governor, by and with 5the advice and consent of the Senate. In the case of a vacancy 6in the office of Superintendent during the recess of the 7Senate, the Governor shall make a temporary appointment until 8the next meeting of the Senate, when the Governor shall 9nominate some person to fill the office, and any person so 10nominated who is confirmed by the Senate shall hold office 11during the remainder of the term and until his or her successor 12is appointed and qualified. The Superintendent shall hold 13office (i) for a term expiring on June 30 of 2015, and every 4 14years thereafter and (ii) until the Superintendent's successor 15is appointed and qualified. The Superintendent shall devote 16his or her full time to the duties of the office, shall not 17serve in any other capacity during his or her term of office, 18and shall receive such compensation as the Governor shall 19determine. The Superintendent shall have an administrative 20certificate with a superintendent endorsement as provided for 21under Section 21-7.1 of the School Code, and shall have a 22degree in educational administration, together with at least 2310 years of experience in either deaf or hard of hearing 24education, the administration of deaf or hard of hearing 25education, or a combination of the 2. Preference shall be 26given to candidates with a degree in deaf education. The   SB3224 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1Superintendent must be fluent in American Sign Language.2    (a-10) The Superintendent of the Illinois School for the 3Blind Visually Impaired shall be the chief executive officer 4of, and shall be responsible for the day to day operations of, 5the School, and shall obtain educational and professional 6employees who are certified by the Illinois State Board of 7Education or licensed by the appropriate agency or entity to 8which licensing authority has been delegated, as well as all 9other employees of the School, subject to the provisions of 10the Personnel Code and any applicable collective bargaining 11agreement. The Superintendent shall be appointed by the 12Governor, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. In 13the case of a vacancy in the office of Superintendent during 14the recess of the Senate, the Governor shall make a temporary 15appointment until the next meeting of the Senate, when the 16Governor shall nominate some person to fill the office, and 17any person so nominated who is confirmed by the Senate shall 18hold office during the remainder of the term and until his or 19her successor is appointed and qualified. The Superintendent 20shall hold office (i) for a term expiring on June 30 of 2015, 21and every 4 years thereafter and (ii) until the 22Superintendent's successor is appointed and qualified. The 23Superintendent shall devote his or her full time to the duties 24of the office, shall not serve in any other capacity during his 25or her term of office, and shall receive such compensation as 26the Governor shall determine. The Superintendent shall have an   SB3224 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1administrative certificate with a superintendent endorsement 2as provided for under Section 21-7.1 of the School Code, and 3shall have a degree in educational administration, together 4with at least 10 years of experience in either blind or 5visually impaired education, the administration of blind or 6visually impaired education, or a combination of the 2. 7Preference shall be given to candidates with a degree in blind 8or visually impaired education. 9    (b) In administering the Illinois School for the Deaf, the 10Department shall adopt an admission policy which permits day 11or residential enrollment, when resources are sufficient, of 12children with hearing disabilities who are able to take 13advantage of the regular educational facilities provided in 14the community and thus unqualified for admission under 15subsection (a). In doing so, the Department shall establish an 16annual deadline by which shall be completed the enrollment of 17children qualified under subsection (a) for admission to the 18Illinois School for the Deaf. After the deadline, the Illinois 19School for the Deaf may enroll other children with hearing 20disabilities at the request of their parents or guardians if 21the Department determines there are sufficient resources to 22meet their needs as well as the needs of children enrolled 23before the deadline and children qualified under subsection 24(a) who may be enrolled after the deadline on an emergency 25basis. The Department shall adopt any rules and regulations 26necessary for the implementation of this subsection.  SB3224 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    (c) In administering the Illinois School for the Blind 2Visually Impaired, the Department shall adopt an admission 3policy that permits day or residential enrollment, when 4resources are sufficient, of children with visual disabilities 5who are able to take advantage of the regular educational 6facilities provided in the community and thus unqualified for 7admission under subsection (a). In doing so, the Department 8shall establish an annual deadline by which the enrollment of 9children qualified under subsection (a) for admission to the 10Illinois School for the Blind Visually Impaired shall be 11completed. After the deadline, the Illinois School for the 12Blind Visually Impaired may enroll other children with visual 13disabilities at the request of their parents or guardians if 14the Department determines there are sufficient resources to 15meet their needs as well as the needs of children enrolled 16before the deadline and children qualified under subsection 17(a) who may be enrolled after the deadline on an emergency 18basis. The Department shall adopt any rules and regulations 19necessary for the implementation of this subsection.20(Source: P.A. 102-196, eff. 7-30-21; 102-264, eff. 8-6-21.) 21    (20 ILCS 2405/10a)22    Sec. 10a. Financial Participation of Students Attending 23the Illinois School for the Deaf and the Illinois School for 24the Blind Visually Impaired.25    (a) General. The Illinois School for the Deaf and the   SB3224 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1Illinois School for the Blind Visually Impaired are required 2to provide eligible students with disabilities with a free and 3appropriate public education as required by Article 14 of the 4Illinois School Code.5    (b) Financial Participation. The Department shall 6promulgate rules concerning fees for activities or services at 7the schools with input from (i) the superintendent of each 8school and (ii) Directors of Special Education from selected 9Local Education Agencies who place students at the schools. 10Parents or guardians of students attending the Illinois School 11for the Deaf or the Illinois School for the Blind Visually 12Impaired may be asked to financially participate in the 13following fees for services or activities provided at the 14schools:15        (1) Registration. 16        (2) Books, labs, and supplies (fees may vary depending 17    on the classes in which a student participates). 18        (3) Athletic or extracurricular activities (students 19    participating in multiple activities will not be required 20    to pay for more than 2 activities). 21        (4) Driver's education (if applicable). 22        (5) Graduation. 23        (6) Yearbook (optional). 24        (7) Activities (trips or leisure activities not 25    associated with classroom curriculum). 26        (8) Other activities or services identified by the   SB3224 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    Department, pursuant to rule. 2    Exceptions may be granted to parents or guardians who are 3unable to meet the financial participation obligations. The 4Department shall promulgate rules concerning requests for 5exception to the financial participation at the schools. 6    Any fees collected for activities or services identified 7in (1) through (8) under this subsection (b) shall be held 8locally by the school and used exclusively for the purpose for 9which the fee was assessed. A separate locally held fund shall 10be established by the Illinois School for the Deaf and the 11Illinois School for the Blind Visually Impaired for this 12purpose. 13    (c) (Blank). 14(Source: P.A. 97-74, eff. 6-30-11; 97-664, eff. 1-13-12.) 15    (20 ILCS 2405/13)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3444)16    Sec. 13. The Department shall have all powers reasonable 17and necessary for the administration of institutions for 18persons with one or more disabilities under subsection (f) of 19Section 3 of this Act, including, but not limited to, the 20authority to do the following: 21    (a) Appoint and remove the superintendents of the 22institutions operated by the Department, except for those 23superintendents whose appointment and removal is provided for 24under Section 10 of this Act; obtain all other employees 25subject to the provisions of the Personnel Code, except for   SB3224 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1educational and professional employees of the Illinois School 2for the Deaf and the Illinois School for the Blind Visually 3Impaired who are certified by the Illinois State Board of 4Education or licensed by the appropriate agency or entity to 5which licensing authority has been delegated, and all other 6employees of the Schools who are obtained by the 7superintendents as provided under Section 10 of this Act, 8subject to the provisions of the Personnel Code and any 9applicable collective bargaining agreement; and conduct staff 10training programs for the development and improvement of 11services. 12    (b) Provide supervision, housing accommodations, board or 13the payment of boarding costs, tuition, and treatment free of 14charge, except as otherwise specified in this Act, for 15residents of this State who are cared for in any institution, 16or for persons receiving services under any program under the 17jurisdiction of the Department. Residents of other states may 18be admitted upon payment of the costs of board, tuition, and 19treatment as determined by the Department; provided, that no 20resident of another state shall be received or retained to the 21exclusion of any resident of this State. The Department shall 22accept any donation for the board, tuition, and treatment of 23any person receiving service or care. 24    (c) Cooperate with the State Board of Education and the 25Department of Children and Family Services in a program to 26provide for the placement, supervision, and foster care of   SB3224 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1children with disabilities who must leave their home community 2in order to attend schools offering programs in special 3education. 4    (d) Assess and collect (i) student activity fees and (ii) 5charges to school districts for transportation of students 6required under the School Code and provided by the Department. 7The Department shall direct the expenditure of all money that 8has been or may be received by any officer of the several State 9institutions under the direction and supervision of the 10Department as profit on sales from commissary stores, student 11activity fees, or charges for student transportation. The 12money shall be deposited into a locally held fund and expended 13under the direction of the Department for the special comfort, 14pleasure, and amusement of residents and employees and the 15transportation of residents, provided that amounts expended 16for comfort, pleasure, and amusement of employees shall not 17exceed the amount of profits derived from sales made to 18employees by the commissaries, as determined by the 19Department. 20    Funds deposited with State institutions under the 21direction and supervision of the Department by or for 22residents of those State institutions shall be deposited into 23interest-bearing accounts, and money received as interest and 24income on those funds shall be deposited into a "needy student 25fund" to be held and administered by the institution. Money in 26the "needy student fund" shall be expended for the special   SB3224 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1comfort, pleasure, and amusement of the residents of the 2particular institution where the money is paid or received. 3    Any money belonging to residents separated by death, 4discharge, or unauthorized absence from institutions described 5under this Section, in custody of officers of the 6institutions, may, if unclaimed by the resident or the legal 7representatives of the resident for a period of 2 years, be 8expended at the direction of the Department for the purposes 9and in the manner specified in this subsection (d). Articles 10of personal property, with the exception of clothing left in 11the custody of those officers, shall, if unclaimed for the 12period of 2 years, be sold and the money disposed of in the 13same manner. 14    Clothing left at the institution by residents at the time 15of separation may be used as determined by the institution if 16unclaimed by the resident or legal representatives of the 17resident within 30 days after notification. 18    (e) Keep, for each institution under the jurisdiction of 19the Department, a register of the number of officers, 20employees, and residents present each day in the year, in a 21form that will permit a calculation of the average number 22present each month. 23    (f) (Blank). 24    (g) (Blank). 25    (h) (Blank). 26    (i) Accept and hold in behalf of the State, if for the   SB3224 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1public interest, a grant, gift, or legacy of money or property 2to the State of Illinois, to the Department, or to any 3institution or program of the Department made in trust for the 4maintenance or support of a resident of an institution of the 5Department, or for any other legitimate purpose connected with 6any such institution or program. The Department shall cause 7each gift, grant, or legacy to be kept as a distinct fund, and 8shall invest the gift, grant, or legacy in the manner provided 9by the laws of this State as those laws now exist or shall 10hereafter be enacted relating to securities in which the 11deposits in savings banks may be invested. The Department may, 12however, in its discretion, deposit in a proper trust company 13or savings bank, during the continuance of the trust, any fund 14so left in trust for the life of a person and shall adopt rules 15and regulations governing the deposit, transfer, or withdrawal 16of the fund. The Department shall, on the expiration of any 17trust as provided in any instrument creating the trust, 18dispose of the fund thereby created in the manner provided in 19the instrument. The Department shall include in its required 20reports a statement showing what funds are so held by it and 21the condition of the funds. Monies found on residents at the 22time of their admission, or accruing to them during their 23period of institutional care, and monies deposited with the 24superintendents by relatives, guardians, or friends of 25residents for the special comfort and pleasure of a resident, 26shall remain in the possession of the superintendents, who   SB3224 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1shall act as trustees for disbursement to, in behalf of, or for 2the benefit of the resident. All types of retirement and 3pension benefits from private and public sources may be paid 4directly to the superintendent of the institution where the 5person is a resident, for deposit to the resident's trust fund 6account. 7    (j) Appoint, subject to the Personnel Code, persons to be 8members of a police and security force. Members of the police 9and security force shall be peace officers and as such have all 10powers possessed by policemen in cities and sheriffs, 11including the power to make arrests on view or warrants of 12violations of State statutes or city or county ordinances. 13These powers may, however, be exercised only in counties of 14more than 500,000 population when required for the protection 15of Department properties, interests, and personnel, or 16specifically requested by appropriate State or local law 17enforcement officials. Members of the police and security 18force may not serve and execute civil processes. 19    (k) Maintain, and deposit receipts from the sale of 20tickets to athletic, musical, and other events, fees for 21participation in school sponsored tournaments and events, and 22revenue from student activities relating to charges for art 23and woodworking projects, charges for automobile repairs, and 24other revenue generated from student projects into, locally 25held accounts not to exceed $20,000 per account for the 26purposes of (i) providing immediate payment to officials,   SB3224 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1judges, and athletic referees for their services rendered and 2for other related expenses at school sponsored contests, 3tournaments, or events, (ii) providing payment for expenses 4related to student revenue producing activities such as art 5and woodworking projects, automotive repair work, and other 6student activities or projects that generate revenue and incur 7expenses, and (iii) providing students who are enrolled in an 8independent living program with cash so that they may fulfill 9course objectives by purchasing commodities and other required 10supplies. 11    (l) Advance moneys from its appropriations to be 12maintained in locally held accounts at the schools to 13establish (i) a "Student Compensation Account" to pay students 14for work performed under the student work program, and (ii) a 15"Student Activity Travel Account" to pay transportation, 16meals, and lodging costs of students, coaches, and activity 17sponsors while traveling off campus for sporting events, 18lessons, and other activities directly associated with the 19representation of the school. Funds in the "Student 20Compensation Account" shall not exceed $20,000, and funds in 21the "Student Activity Travel Account" shall not exceed 22$200,000. 23    (l-5) Establish a locally held account (referred to as the 24Account) to hold, maintain and administer the 25Therkelsen/Hansen College Loan Fund (referred to as the Fund). 26All cash represented by the Fund shall be transferred from the   SB3224 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1State Treasury to the Account. The Department shall promulgate 2rules regarding the maintenance and use of the Fund and all 3interest earned thereon; the eligibility of potential 4borrowers from the Fund; and the awarding and repayment of 5loans from the Fund; and other rules as applicable regarding 6the Fund. The administration of the Fund and the promulgation 7of rules regarding the Fund shall be consistent with the will 8of Petrea Therkelsen, which establishes the Fund.9    (m) Promulgate rules of conduct applicable to the 10residents of institutions for persons with one or more 11disabilities. The rules shall include specific standards to be 12used by the Department to determine (i) whether financial 13restitution shall be required in the event of losses or 14damages resulting from a resident's action and (ii) the 15ability of the resident and the resident's parents to pay 16restitution. 17(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 18    (20 ILCS 2405/17)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3448)19    Sec. 17. Child Abuse and Neglect Reports. 20    (a) All applicants for employment at the Illinois School 21for the Blind Visually Impaired, the Illinois School for the 22Deaf, the Illinois Center for the Rehabilitation and 23Education-Roosevelt, and the Illinois Center for the 24Rehabilitation and Education-Wood shall as a condition of 25employment authorize, in writing on a form prescribed by the   SB3224 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1Department of Children and Family Services, an investigation 2of the Central Register, as defined in the Abused and 3Neglected Child Reporting Act, to ascertain if the applicant 4has been determined to be a perpetrator in an indicated report 5of child abuse or neglect.6    (b) The information concerning a prospective employee 7obtained by the Department shall be confidential and exempt 8from public inspection and copying, as provided under Section 97 of The Freedom of Information Act, and the information shall 10not be transmitted outside the Department, except as provided 11in the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, and shall not 12be transmitted to anyone within the Department except as 13needed for the purposes of evaluation of an application for 14employment.15(Source: P.A. 104-270, eff. 8-15-25.) 16    Section 15. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1714-8.02 as follows: 18    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.02)19    Sec. 14-8.02. Identification, evaluation, and placement of 20children. 21    (a) The State Board of Education shall make rules under 22which local school boards shall determine the eligibility of 23children to receive special education. Such rules shall ensure 24that a free appropriate public education be available to all   SB3224 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1children with disabilities as defined in Section 14-1.02. The 2State Board of Education shall require local school districts 3to administer non-discriminatory procedures or tests to 4English learners coming from homes in which a language other 5than English is used to determine their eligibility to receive 6special education. The placement of low English proficiency 7students in special education programs and facilities shall be 8made in accordance with the test results reflecting the 9student's linguistic, cultural and special education needs. 10For purposes of determining the eligibility of children the 11State Board of Education shall include in the rules 12definitions of "case study", "staff conference", 13"individualized educational program", and "qualified 14specialist" appropriate to each category of children with 15disabilities as defined in this Article. For purposes of 16determining the eligibility of children from homes in which a 17language other than English is used, the State Board of 18Education shall include in the rules definitions for 19"qualified bilingual specialists" and "linguistically and 20culturally appropriate individualized educational programs". 21For purposes of this Section, as well as Sections 14-8.02a, 2214-8.02b, and 14-8.02c of this Code, "parent" means a parent 23as defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities 24Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1401(23)). 25    (b) No child shall be eligible for special education 26facilities except with a carefully completed case study fully   SB3224 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1reviewed by professional personnel in a multidisciplinary 2staff conference and only upon the recommendation of qualified 3specialists or a qualified bilingual specialist, if available. 4At the conclusion of the multidisciplinary staff conference, 5the parent of the child and, if the child is in the legal 6custody of the Department of Children and Family Services, the 7Department's Office of Education and Transition Services shall 8be given a copy of the multidisciplinary conference summary 9report and recommendations, which includes options considered, 10and, in the case of the parent, be informed of his or her right 11to obtain an independent educational evaluation if he or she 12disagrees with the evaluation findings conducted or obtained 13by the school district. If the school district's evaluation is 14shown to be inappropriate, the school district shall reimburse 15the parent for the cost of the independent evaluation. The 16State Board of Education shall, with advice from the State 17Advisory Council on Education of Children with Disabilities on 18the inclusion of specific independent educational evaluators, 19prepare a list of suggested independent educational 20evaluators. The State Board of Education shall include on the 21list clinical psychologists licensed pursuant to the Clinical 22Psychologist Licensing Act. Such psychologists shall not be 23paid fees in excess of the amount that would be received by a 24school psychologist for performing the same services. The 25State Board of Education shall supply school districts with 26such list and make the list available to parents at their   SB3224 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1request. School districts shall make the list available to 2parents at the time they are informed of their right to obtain 3an independent educational evaluation. However, the school 4district may initiate an impartial due process hearing under 5this Section within 7 school days of any written parent 6request for an independent educational evaluation to show that 7its evaluation is appropriate. If the final decision is that 8the evaluation is appropriate, the parent still has a right to 9an independent educational evaluation, but not at public 10expense. An independent educational evaluation at public 11expense must be completed within 60 school days of a parent's 12written request unless the school district initiates an 13impartial due process hearing or the parent or school district 14offers reasonable grounds to show that such time period should 15be extended. If the due process hearing decision indicates 16that the parent is entitled to an independent educational 17evaluation, it must be completed within 60 school days of the 18decision unless the parent or the school district offers 19reasonable grounds to show that such period should be 20extended. If a parent disagrees with the summary report or 21recommendations of the multidisciplinary conference or the 22findings of any educational evaluation which results 23therefrom, the school district shall not proceed with a 24placement based upon such evaluation and the child shall 25remain in his or her regular classroom setting. No child shall 26be eligible for admission to a special class for children with   SB3224 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1a mental disability who are educable or for children with a 2mental disability who are trainable except with a 3psychological evaluation and recommendation by a school 4psychologist. Consent shall be obtained from the parent of a 5child before any evaluation is conducted. If consent is not 6given by the parent or if the parent disagrees with the 7findings of the evaluation, then the school district may 8initiate an impartial due process hearing under this Section. 9The school district may evaluate the child if that is the 10decision resulting from the impartial due process hearing and 11the decision is not appealed or if the decision is affirmed on 12appeal. The determination of eligibility shall be made and the 13IEP meeting shall be completed within 60 school days from the 14date of written parental consent. In those instances when 15written parental consent is obtained with fewer than 60 pupil 16attendance days left in the school year, the eligibility 17determination shall be made and the IEP meeting shall be 18completed prior to the first day of the following school year. 19Special education and related services must be provided in 20accordance with the student's IEP no later than 10 school 21attendance days after notice is provided to the parents 22pursuant to Section 300.503 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal 23Regulations and implementing rules adopted by the State Board 24of Education. The appropriate program pursuant to the 25individualized educational program of students whose native 26tongue is a language other than English shall reflect the   SB3224 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1special education, cultural and linguistic needs. No later 2than September 1, 1993, the State Board of Education shall 3establish standards for the development, implementation and 4monitoring of appropriate bilingual special individualized 5educational programs. The State Board of Education shall 6further incorporate appropriate monitoring procedures to 7verify implementation of these standards. The district shall 8indicate to the parent, the State Board of Education, and, if 9applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 10Transition Services the nature of the services the child will 11receive for the regular school term while awaiting placement 12in the appropriate special education class. At the child's 13initial IEP meeting and at each annual review meeting, the 14child's IEP team shall provide the child's parent or guardian 15and, if applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 16Transition Services with a written notification that informs 17the parent or guardian or the Department's Office of Education 18and Transition Services that the IEP team is required to 19consider whether the child requires assistive technology in 20order to receive free, appropriate public education. The 21notification must also include a toll-free telephone number 22and internet address for the State's assistive technology 23program. 24    If the child is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, or visually 25impaired or has an orthopedic impairment or physical 26disability and he or she might be eligible to receive services   SB3224 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1from the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois School for 2the Blind Visually Impaired, the Illinois Center for 3Rehabilitation and Education-Wood, or the Illinois Center for 4Rehabilitation and Education-Roosevelt, the school district 5shall notify the parents, in writing, of the existence of 6these schools and the services they provide and shall make a 7reasonable effort to inform the parents of the existence of 8other, local schools that provide similar services and the 9services that these other schools provide. This notification 10shall include, without limitation, information on school 11services, school admissions criteria, and school contact 12information.13    In the development of the individualized education program 14for a student who has a disability on the autism spectrum 15(which includes autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, 16pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified, 17childhood disintegrative disorder, and Rett Syndrome, as 18defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 19Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV, 2000)), the IEP team shall 20consider all of the following factors:21        (1) The verbal and nonverbal communication needs of 22    the child.23        (2) The need to develop social interaction skills and 24    proficiencies.25        (3) The needs resulting from the child's unusual 26    responses to sensory experiences.  SB3224 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1        (4) The needs resulting from resistance to 2    environmental change or change in daily routines.3        (5) The needs resulting from engagement in repetitive 4    activities and stereotyped movements.5        (6) The need for any positive behavioral 6    interventions, strategies, and supports to address any 7    behavioral difficulties resulting from autism spectrum 8    disorder.9        (7) Other needs resulting from the child's disability 10    that impact progress in the general curriculum, including 11    social and emotional development.12Public Act 95-257 does not create any new entitlement to a 13service, program, or benefit, but must not affect any 14entitlement to a service, program, or benefit created by any 15other law. 16    If the student may be eligible to participate in the 17Home-Based Support Services Program for Adults with Mental 18Disabilities authorized under the Developmental Disability and 19Mental Disability Services Act upon becoming an adult, the 20student's individualized education program shall include plans 21for (i) determining the student's eligibility for those 22home-based services, (ii) enrolling the student in the program 23of home-based services, and (iii) developing a plan for the 24student's most effective use of the home-based services after 25the student becomes an adult and no longer receives special 26educational services under this Article. The plans developed   SB3224 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1under this paragraph shall include specific actions to be 2taken by specified individuals, agencies, or officials.3    (c) In the development of the individualized education 4program for a student who is functionally blind, it shall be 5presumed that proficiency in Braille reading and writing is 6essential for the student's satisfactory educational progress. 7For purposes of this subsection, the State Board of Education 8shall determine the criteria for a student to be classified as 9functionally blind. Students who are not currently identified 10as functionally blind who are also entitled to Braille 11instruction include: (i) those whose vision loss is so severe 12that they are unable to read and write at a level comparable to 13their peers solely through the use of vision, and (ii) those 14who show evidence of progressive vision loss that may result 15in functional blindness. Each student who is functionally 16blind shall be entitled to Braille reading and writing 17instruction that is sufficient to enable the student to 18communicate with the same level of proficiency as other 19students of comparable ability. Instruction should be provided 20to the extent that the student is physically and cognitively 21able to use Braille. Braille instruction may be used in 22combination with other special education services appropriate 23to the student's educational needs. The assessment of each 24student who is functionally blind for the purpose of 25developing the student's individualized education program 26shall include documentation of the student's strengths and   SB3224 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1weaknesses in Braille skills. Each person assisting in the 2development of the individualized education program for a 3student who is functionally blind shall receive information 4describing the benefits of Braille instruction. The 5individualized education program for each student who is 6functionally blind shall specify the appropriate learning 7medium or media based on the assessment report.8    (d) To the maximum extent appropriate, the placement shall 9provide the child with the opportunity to be educated with 10children who do not have a disability; provided that children 11with disabilities who are recommended to be placed into 12regular education classrooms are provided with supplementary 13services to assist the children with disabilities to benefit 14from the regular classroom instruction and are included on the 15teacher's regular education class register. Subject to the 16limitation of the preceding sentence, placement in special 17classes, separate schools or other removal of the child with a 18disability from the regular educational environment shall 19occur only when the nature of the severity of the disability is 20such that education in the regular classes with the use of 21supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved 22satisfactorily. The placement of English learners with 23disabilities shall be in non-restrictive environments which 24provide for integration with peers who do not have 25disabilities in bilingual classrooms. Annually, each January, 26school districts shall report data on students from   SB3224 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1non-English speaking backgrounds receiving special education 2and related services in public and private facilities as 3prescribed in Section 2-3.30. If there is a disagreement 4between parties involved regarding the special education 5placement of any child, either in-state or out-of-state, the 6placement is subject to impartial due process procedures 7described in Article 10 of the Rules and Regulations to Govern 8the Administration and Operation of Special Education.9    (e) No child who comes from a home in which a language 10other than English is the principal language used may be 11assigned to any class or program under this Article until he 12has been given, in the principal language used by the child and 13used in his home, tests reasonably related to his cultural 14environment. All testing and evaluation materials and 15procedures utilized for evaluation and placement shall not be 16linguistically, racially or culturally discriminatory.17    (f) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require 18any child to undergo any physical examination or medical 19treatment whose parents object thereto on the grounds that 20such examination or treatment conflicts with his religious 21beliefs.22    (g) School boards or their designee shall provide to the 23parents of a child or, if applicable, the Department of 24Children and Family Services' Office of Education and 25Transition Services prior written notice of any decision (a) 26proposing to initiate or change, or (b) refusing to initiate   SB3224 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1or change, the identification, evaluation, or educational 2placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate 3public education to their child, and the reasons therefor. For 4a parent, such written notification shall also inform the 5parent of the opportunity to present complaints with respect 6to any matter relating to the educational placement of the 7student, or the provision of a free appropriate public 8education and to have an impartial due process hearing on the 9complaint. The notice shall inform the parents in the parents' 10native language, unless it is clearly not feasible to do so, of 11their rights and all procedures available pursuant to this Act 12and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 13Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446); it shall be the 14responsibility of the State Superintendent to develop uniform 15notices setting forth the procedures available under this Act 16and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 17Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446) to be used by all 18school boards. The notice shall also inform the parents of the 19availability upon request of a list of free or low-cost legal 20and other relevant services available locally to assist 21parents in initiating an impartial due process hearing. The 22State Superintendent shall revise the uniform notices required 23by this subsection (g) to reflect current law and procedures 24at least once every 2 years. Any parent who is deaf or does not 25normally communicate using spoken English and who participates 26in a meeting with a representative of a local educational   SB3224 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1agency for the purposes of developing an individualized 2educational program or attends a multidisciplinary conference 3shall be entitled to the services of an interpreter. The State 4Board of Education must adopt rules to establish the criteria, 5standards, and competencies for a bilingual language 6interpreter who attends an individualized education program 7meeting under this subsection to assist a parent who has 8limited English proficiency. 9    (g-5) For purposes of this subsection (g-5), "qualified 10professional" means an individual who holds credentials to 11evaluate the child in the domain or domains for which an 12evaluation is sought or an intern working under the direct 13supervision of a qualified professional, including a master's 14or doctoral degree candidate.15    To ensure that a parent can participate fully and 16effectively with school personnel in the development of 17appropriate educational and related services for his or her 18child, the parent, an independent educational evaluator, or a 19qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a parent or 20child must be afforded reasonable access to educational 21facilities, personnel, classrooms, and buildings and to the 22child as provided in this subsection (g-5). The requirements 23of this subsection (g-5) apply to any public school facility, 24building, or program and to any facility, building, or program 25supported in whole or in part by public funds. Prior to 26visiting a school, school building, or school facility, the   SB3224 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1parent, independent educational evaluator, or qualified 2professional may be required by the school district to inform 3the building principal or supervisor in writing of the 4proposed visit, the purpose of the visit, and the approximate 5duration of the visit. The visitor and the school district 6shall arrange the visit or visits at times that are mutually 7agreeable. Visitors shall comply with school safety, security, 8and visitation policies at all times. School district 9visitation policies must not conflict with this subsection 10(g-5). Visitors shall be required to comply with the 11requirements of applicable privacy laws, including those laws 12protecting the confidentiality of education records such as 13the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the 14Illinois School Student Records Act. The visitor shall not 15disrupt the educational process.16        (1) A parent must be afforded reasonable access of 17    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of observing 18    his or her child in the child's current educational 19    placement, services, or program or for the purpose of 20    visiting an educational placement or program proposed for 21    the child.22        (2) An independent educational evaluator or a 23    qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a 24    parent or child must be afforded reasonable access of 25    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of 26    conducting an evaluation of the child, the child's   SB3224 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    performance, the child's current educational program, 2    placement, services, or environment, or any educational 3    program, placement, services, or environment proposed for 4    the child, including interviews of educational personnel, 5    child observations, assessments, tests or assessments of 6    the child's educational program, services, or placement or 7    of any proposed educational program, services, or 8    placement. If one or more interviews of school personnel 9    are part of the evaluation, the interviews must be 10    conducted at a mutually agreed-upon time, date, and place 11    that do not interfere with the school employee's school 12    duties. The school district may limit interviews to 13    personnel having information relevant to the child's 14    current educational services, program, or placement or to 15    a proposed educational service, program, or placement.16    (h) In the development of the individualized education 17program or federal Section 504 plan for a student, if the 18student needs extra accommodation during emergencies, 19including natural disasters or an active shooter situation, 20then that accommodation shall be taken into account when 21developing the student's individualized education program or 22federal Section 504 plan. 23(Source: P.A. 103-197, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 24104-270, eff. 8-15-25; 104-368, eff. 1-1-26; revised 9-12-25.) 25    Section 20. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by   SB3224 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1changing Section 50 as follows: 2    (105 ILCS 128/50)3    Sec. 50. Crisis response mapping data grants.4    (a) Subject to appropriation, a public school district, a 5charter school, a special education cooperative or district, 6an education for employment system, a State-approved area 7career center, a public university laboratory school, the 8Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy, the Department of 9Juvenile Justice School District, a regional office of 10education, the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois 11School for the Blind Visually Impaired, the Philip J. Rock 12Center and School, an early childhood or preschool program 13supported by the Early Childhood Block Grant, or any other 14public school entity designated by the State Board of 15Education by rule, may apply to the State Board of Education or 16the State Board's designee for a grant to obtain crisis 17response mapping data and to provide copies of the crisis 18response mapping data to appropriate local, county, State, and 19federal first responders for use in response to emergencies. 20The crisis response mapping data shall be stored and provided 21in an electronic or digital format to assist first responders 22in responding to emergencies at the school.23    (b) Subject to appropriation, including funding for any 24administrative costs reasonably incurred by the State Board of 25Education or the State Board's designee in the administration   SB3224 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1of the grant program described by this Section, the State 2Board shall provide grants to any entity in subsection (a) 3upon approval of an application submitted by the entity to 4cover the costs incurred in obtaining crisis response mapping 5data under this Section. The grant application must include 6crisis response mapping data for all schools under the 7jurisdiction of the entity submitting the application, 8including, in the case of a public school district, any 9charter schools authorized by the school board for the school 10district.11    (c) To be eligible for a grant under this Section, the 12crisis response mapping data must, at a minimum:13        (1) be compatible and integrate into security software 14    platforms in use by the specific school for which the data 15    is provided without requiring local law enforcement 16    agencies or the school district to purchase additional 17    software or requiring the integration of third-party 18    software to view the data; 19        (2) be compatible with security software platforms in 20    use by the specific school for which the data is provided 21    without requiring local public safety agencies or the 22    school district to purchase additional software or 23    requiring the integration of third-party software to view 24    the data; 25        (3) be capable of being provided in a printable 26    format;   SB3224 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1        (4) be verified for accuracy by an on-site 2    walk-through of the school building and grounds; 3        (5) be oriented to true north; 4        (6) be overlaid on current aerial imagery or plans of 5    the school building; 6        (7) contain site-specific labeling that matches the 7    structure of the school building, including room labels, 8    hallway names, and external door or stairwell numbers and 9    the location of hazards, critical utilities, key boxes, 10    automated external defibrillators, and trauma kits, and 11    that matches the school grounds, including parking areas, 12    athletic fields, surrounding roads, and neighboring 13    properties; and 14        (8) be overlaid with gridded x/y coordinates. 15    (d) Subject to appropriation, the crisis response mapping 16data may be reviewed annually to update the data as necessary.17    (e) Crisis response mapping data obtained pursuant to this 18Section are confidential and exempt from disclosure under the 19Freedom of Information Act.20    (f) The State Board may adopt rules to implement the 21provisions of this Section. 22(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-780, eff. 8-2-24.) 24    Section 25. The Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act 25is amended by changing Section 2 as follows:   SB3224 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    (115 ILCS 5/2)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1702)2    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    (a) "Educational employer" or "employer" means the 4governing body of a public school district, including the 5governing body of a charter school established under Article 627A of the School Code or of a contract school or contract 7turnaround school established under paragraph 30 of Section 834-18 of the School Code, combination of public school 9districts, including the governing body of joint agreements of 10any type formed by 2 or more school districts, public 11community college district or State college or university, a 12subcontractor of instructional services of a school district 13(other than a school district organized under Article 34 of 14the School Code), combination of school districts, charter 15school established under Article 27A of the School Code, or 16contract school or contract turnaround school established 17under paragraph 30 of Section 34-18 of the School Code, an 18Independent Authority created under Section 2-3.25f-5 of the 19School Code, and any State agency whose major function is 20providing educational services. "Educational employer" or 21"employer" does not include (1) a Financial Oversight Panel 22created pursuant to Section 1A-8 of the School Code due to a 23district violating a financial plan or (2) an approved 24nonpublic special education facility that contracts with a 25school district or combination of school districts to provide   SB3224 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1special education services pursuant to Section 14-7.02 of the 2School Code, but does include a School Finance Authority 3created under Article 1E of the School Code and a Financial 4Oversight Panel created under Article 1B or 1H of the School 5Code. The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this paragraph 6(a) to make clear that the governing body of a charter school 7is an educational employer is declaratory of existing law. 8    (b) "Educational employee" or "employee" means any 9individual, excluding supervisors, managerial, confidential, 10short term employees, student, and part-time academic 11employees of community colleges employed full or part time by 12an educational employer, but shall not include elected 13officials and appointees of the Governor with the advice and 14consent of the Senate, firefighters as defined by subsection 15(g-1) of Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, 16and peace officers employed by a State university. However, 17with respect to an educational employer of a school district 18organized under Article 34 of the School Code, a supervisor 19shall be considered an educational employee under this 20definition unless the supervisor is also a managerial 21employee. For the purposes of this Act, part-time academic 22employees of community colleges shall be defined as those 23employees who provide less than 3 credit hours of instruction 24per academic semester. In this subsection (b), the term 25"student" does not include graduate students who are research 26assistants primarily performing duties that involve research,   SB3224 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1graduate assistants primarily performing duties that are 2pre-professional, graduate students who are teaching 3assistants primarily performing duties that involve the 4delivery and support of instruction, or any other graduate 5assistants.6    (c) "Employee organization" or "labor organization" means 7an organization of any kind in which membership includes 8educational employees, and which exists for the purpose, in 9whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning 10grievances, employee-employer disputes, wages, rates of pay, 11hours of employment, or conditions of work, but shall not 12include any organization which practices discrimination in 13membership because of race, color, creed, age, gender, 14national origin or political affiliation.15    (d) "Exclusive representative" means the labor 16organization which has been designated by the Illinois 17Educational Labor Relations Board as the representative of the 18majority of educational employees in an appropriate unit, or 19recognized by an educational employer prior to January 1, 1984 20as the exclusive representative of the employees in an 21appropriate unit or, after January 1, 1984, recognized by an 22employer upon evidence that the employee organization has been 23designated as the exclusive representative by a majority of 24the employees in an appropriate unit.25    (e) "Board" means the Illinois Educational Labor Relations 26Board.  SB3224 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1    (f) "Regional Superintendent" means the regional 2superintendent of schools provided for in Articles 3 and 3A of 3The School Code.4    (g) "Supervisor" means any individual having authority in 5the interests of the employer to hire, transfer, suspend, lay 6off, recall, promote, discharge, reward or discipline other 7employees within the appropriate bargaining unit and adjust 8their grievances, or to effectively recommend such action if 9the exercise of such authority is not of a merely routine or 10clerical nature but requires the use of independent judgment. 11The term "supervisor" includes only those individuals who 12devote a preponderance of their employment time to such 13exercising authority.14    (h) "Unfair labor practice" or "unfair practice" means any 15practice prohibited by Section 14 of this Act.16    (i) "Person" includes an individual, educational employee, 17educational employer, legal representative, or employee 18organization.19    (j) "Wages" means salaries or other forms of compensation 20for services rendered.21    (k) "Professional employee" means, in the case of a public 22community college, State college or university, State agency 23whose major function is providing educational services, the 24Illinois School for the Deaf, and the Illinois School for the 25Blind Visually Impaired, (1) any employee engaged in work (i) 26predominantly intellectual and varied in character as opposed   SB3224 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1to routine mental, manual, mechanical, or physical work; (ii) 2involving the consistent exercise of discretion and judgment 3in its performance; (iii) of such character that the output 4produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in 5relation to a given period of time; and (iv) requiring 6knowledge of an advanced type in a field of science or learning 7customarily acquired by a prolonged course of specialized 8intellectual instruction and study in an institution of higher 9learning or a hospital, as distinguished from a general 10academic education or from an apprenticeship or from training 11in the performance of routine mental, manual, or physical 12processes; or (2) any employee, who (i) has completed the 13courses of specialized intellectual instruction and study 14described in clause (iv) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, 15and (ii) is performing related work under the supervision of a 16professional person to qualify himself or herself to become a 17professional as defined in paragraph (l).18    (l) "Professional employee" means, in the case of any 19public school district, or combination of school districts 20pursuant to joint agreement, any employee who has a license 21issued under Article 21B of the School Code.22    (m) "Unit" or "bargaining unit" means any group of 23employees for which an exclusive representative is selected.24    (n) "Confidential employee" means an employee, who (i) in 25the regular course of his or her duties, assists and acts in a 26confidential capacity to persons who formulate, determine and   SB3224 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b1effectuate management policies with regard to labor relations 2or who (ii) in the regular course of his or her duties has 3access to information relating to the effectuation or review 4of the employer's collective bargaining policies.5    (o) "Managerial employee" means, with respect to an 6educational employer other than an educational employer of a 7school district organized under Article 34 of the School Code, 8an individual who is engaged predominantly in executive and 9management functions and is charged with the responsibility of 10directing the effectuation of such management policies and 11practices or, with respect to an educational employer of a 12school district organized under Article 34 of the School Code, 13an individual who has a significant role in the negotiation of 14collective bargaining agreements or who formulates and 15determines employer-wide management policies and practices. 16"Managerial employee" includes a general superintendent of 17schools provided for under Section 34-6 of the School Code.18    (p) "Craft employee" means a skilled journeyman, craft 19person, and his or her apprentice or helper.20    (q) "Short-term employee" is an employee who is employed 21for less than 2 consecutive calendar quarters during a 22calendar year and who does not have a reasonable expectation 23that he or she will be rehired by the same employer for the 24same service in a subsequent calendar year. Nothing in this 25subsection shall affect the employee status of individuals who 26were covered by a collective bargaining agreement on January   SB3224 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 17718 KTG 31149 b11, 1992 (the effective date of Public Act 87-736).2    The changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-1138 3may not be construed to void or change the powers and duties 4given to local school councils under Section 34-2.3 of the 5School Code. 6(Source: P.A. 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 7102-1138, eff. 2-10-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    Section 30. The MRSA Prevention, Control, and Reporting 9Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 10    (410 ILCS 120/5)11    Sec. 5. Definition. In this Act, "State residential 12facility" or "facility" means: any Department of Human 13Services operated residential facility, including any State 14mental health hospital, State developmental center, or State 15residential school for the deaf and blind visually impaired; 16any Department of Corrections operated correctional center, 17work camp or boot camp; and any Department of Juvenile Justice 18operated juvenile center or boot camp. 19(Source: P.A. 96-438, eff. 8-14-09.)